Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 53.36.030 and 2023 c 470 s 2094 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a port district may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, together with any existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of one-fourth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.(b) Port districts having less than eight hundred million dollars in value of taxable property during 1991 may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for port district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, combined with existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district. Prior to contracting for any indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b), the port district must have a comprehensive plan for harbor improvements or industrial development and a long-term financial plan approved by the department of commerce. The department of commerce is immune from any liability for its part in reviewing or approving port district's improvement or development plans, or financial plans. Any indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b) may be used only to acquire or construct a facility, and, prior to contracting for such indebtedness, the port district must have a lease contract for a minimum of five years for the facility to be acquired or constructed by the debt.(2) With the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called for that purpose, a port district may contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor provided the total indebtedness of the district at any such time shall not exceed three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.(3) In addition to the indebtedness authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, port districts having less than two hundred million dollars in value of taxable property and operating a municipal airport may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional one-eighth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district without authorization by the voters; and, with the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called for that purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor for an additional three-eighths of one percent provided the total indebtedness of the district for all port purposes at any such time shall not exceed one and one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.(4)(a) In addition to the indebtedness authorized under subsections (1) through (3) of this section, a port district that meets the requirements in (b) of this subsection (4) may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional 0.25 percent of the value of the taxable property in the district without authorization by the voters.(b) In order to contract indebtedness or borrow money as provided in (a) of this subsection (4), the following conditions must be met:(i) The port district must have created an increment area under chapter 39.114 RCW;(ii) The estimated taxable assessed value within the port district is between $6,000,000,000 and $7,000,000,000 in the calendar year in which the resolution or ordinance establishing the increment area is adopted;(iii) In the calendar year in which the resolution or ordinance establishing the increment area is adopted, the estimated taxable assessed value of the properties in the increment area is less than $150,000,000, as specified in the resolution or ordinance establishing the increment area; and(iv) Any indebtedness or borrowings under (a) of this subsection (4) must be used for the purpose of financing public improvements under chapter 39.114 RCW.(5) Any port district may issue general district bonds evidencing any indebtedness, payable at any time not exceeding fifty years from the date of the bonds. Any contract for indebtedness or borrowed money authorized by ((RCW 53.36.030(1)(b) [subsection (1)(b) of this section]))subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed twenty-five years. The bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.(((5)))(6) Elections required under this section shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.(((6)))(7) For the purpose of this section, "indebtedness of the district" shall not include any debt of a countywide district with a population less than twenty-five hundred people when the debt is secured by a mortgage on property leased to the federal government; and the term "value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.(((7)))(8) This section does not apply to a loan made under a loan agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and a computation of indebtedness under this chapter must exclude the amount of a loan under such a loan agreement.--- END ---